Hawaii statutes.
§92-2 Definitions. As used in this part:

"Board"
means any agency, board, commission, authority, or committee of the State or
its political subdivisions which is created by constitution, statute, rule, or
executive order, to have supervision, control, jurisdiction, or advisory power
over specific matters and which is required to conduct meetings and to take
official actions.

"Chance
meeting" means a social or informal assemblage of two or more members at
which matters relating to official business are not discussed.

"Interactive
conference technology" means any form of audio or audio and visual
conference technology, including teleconference, videoconference, and voice
over internet protocol, that facilitates interaction between the public and
board members.

"Meeting"
means the convening of a board for which a quorum is required in order to make
a decision or to deliberate toward a decision upon a matter over which the
board has supervision, control, jurisdiction, or advisory power. [L 1975, c
166, pt of §1; am L 1976, c 212, §1; am L 2012, c 202, §1]

Attorney General Opinions

Trustees of travel agency recovery fund
comprise board subject to sunshine law. Att. Gen. Op. 85-14.

Associated Students of University of Hawaii
not a "board" subject to sunshine law. Att. Gen. Op. 85-18.

"Board" includes committees or
subgroups of the board. Att. Gen. Op. 85-27.

County council is a "board".
Att. Gen. Op. 86-5.

Agency's retreat would be a
"meeting" subject to sunshine law. Att. Gen. Op. 86-19.

Law Journals and Reviews

Hawai`i's Sunshine Law Compliance
Criteria. 26 UH L. Rev. 21.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next